Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6053YC (2) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.175 Human trafficking 1 prevention training ââ commercial drivers. 2 1. An applicant for a class A, B, or C commercial driverâs 3 license must certify to the department that the applicant 4 successfully completed a course of instruction regarding the 5 operation of a motor vehicle that included approved human 6 trafficking prevention training. 7 2. A person who offers a course of instruction regarding 8 the operation of a commercial motor vehicle shall provide at 9 least thirty minutes of approved human trafficking prevention 10 training as part of the course. The training shall not be 11 offered in a language other than English. 12 3. The department shall approve, in cooperation with the 13 department of education and the state board of education, 14 human trafficking prevention training materials regarding the 15 recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking. 16 The departments may collaborate with other entities that 17 specialize in and produce training materials regarding the 18 recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking 19 particularly for persons who operate commercial motor vehicles. 20 The departments shall make the approved human trafficking 21 prevention training materials available to the public. The 22 departments shall review and update the departmentsâ approved 23 human trafficking prevention training materials to account for 24 changes and trends in human trafficking at least once every 25 three years. 26 4. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 27 administer this section. 28 Sec. 2. Section 321.188, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 29 by adding the following new paragraph: 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. For a person applying for a class A, B, 31 or C commercial driverâs license, certify that the applicant 32 has completed approved human trafficking prevention training in 33 accordance with section 321.175. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 6053YC (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 H.F. _____ The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to human trafficking prevention training 3 for persons who apply for a class A, B, or C commercial 4 driverâs license (CDL). The bill requires such an applicant 5 to certify to the department of transportation (DOT) that 6 the applicant successfully completed a course of instruction 7 regarding the operation of a motor vehicle that included 8 approved human trafficking prevention training. 9 The bill requires a person who offers a course of instruction 10 regarding the operation of a commercial motor vehicle to 11 provide at least 30 minutes of approved human trafficking 12 prevention training in English as part of the course. 13 Under the bill, the DOT must approve, in cooperation with 14 the department of education and the state board of education, 15 human trafficking prevention training materials regarding the 16 recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking, 17 and make the approved materials available to the public. The 18 departments may collaborate with other entities that specialize 19 in and produce training materials regarding the recognition, 20 prevention, and reporting of human trafficking particularly 21 for persons who operate commercial motor vehicles. The 22 departments are required to review and update the approved 23 human trafficking prevention training materials to account for 24 changes and trends in human trafficking at least once every 25 three years. 26 -2- LSB 6053YC (2) 91 th/ns 2/ 2